Hawaii statutes.
§576B-209 Credit for payments. A
tribunal of this State shall credit amounts collected for a particular period
pursuant to any child support order against the amounts owed for the same
period under any other child support order for support of the same child issued
by a tribunal of this State, another state, or a foreign country. [L 1997, c
295, pt of §1; am L 2015, c 77, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next